Louisiana, session 2026, HB140.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Articles 315(B)(introductory paragraph), 813(C),
815.1(D), 818(A), 843, and 877 are hereby amended and reenacted and Children's Code
Articles 412(Q), 804(10), and 877.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 315. Transfer of proper venue
* * *
B. After adjudication, the court in which a petition is filed shall may transfer
the proceeding if it receives information at any time that both of the following exist:
* * *
Art. 412. Confidentiality of records; disclosure exceptions; sanctions
* * *
Q. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit law enforcement officers,
prosecuting agencies, or judicial officers from obtaining records relating to
delinquency or status offenses proceedings which are relevant to an ongoing
delinquency or criminal investigation or proceeding. A court order shall not be
necessary for such access. However, the custodian of such records may seek a
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 140 ENROLLED
protective order prohibiting or limiting the disclosure upon a showing of good cause
that such protection is necessary in the interests of justice. All such records produced
and the information contained therein shall be protected from disclosure by the
recipient outside of the criminal justice system as defined in R.S. 15:572.
* * *
Art. 804. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
(10) "Custody" means actual confinement in a detention center.
* * *
Art. 813. Taking child into custody with a court order; filing of verified complaint;
execution
* * *
C. An order directing that a child be taken into custody may be executed by
a peace officer or the child's probation officer having territorial jurisdiction over the
child. The officer shall promptly notify the child's parents that their child has been
taken into custody and promptly notify the district attorney in the jurisdiction where
any court order for the child to be taken into custody was issued that the child has
been taken into custody by filing notice in the court record where the petition on the
original charge is pending advising the court of the custodial location of the child
with a copy provided to the district attorney and certification of notice provided to
the district attorney. Notification to the district attorney is required even if the court
order is issued from a different jurisdiction than the one where the child is taken into
custody. The officer shall also promptly conduct the child to the appropriate facility
in accordance with Article 815.
* * *
Art. 815.1. Alternative to detention programs
* * *
D. An alternative to detention program shall be considered a form of
detention and the time periods set forth in Articles 854 and 877 shall apply unless
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 140 ENROLLED
waived by the child. No child shall remain enrolled in an alternative to detention
program following a disposition hearing, except as an alternative to placement in
detention or other out-of-home placement.
E. An alternative to detention program is intended to serve the same limited
purpose as secure detention as set forth in R.S. 15:1110. The child's participation in
an alternative to detention program shall not be considered an adjudication nor shall
it suspend delinquency proceedings. An alternative to detention program may
include rehabilitative components, but continued participation in the program shall
not be required post-adjudication, except as an alternative to detention of the child
or other out-of-home placement. Placement of a child in an alternative to detention
program does not preclude the child from being referred to treatment programs that
are not required as a condition of the child's release from detention.
* * *
Art. 818. Identification procedures
A. (1) A child may shall be photographed or fingerprinted in connection with
being taken into custody for the commission of either: a felony-grade delinquent act.
(1) A felony-grade delinquent act.
(2) A child may be photographed or fingerprinted in connection with being
taken into custody for the commission of a misdemeanor-grade delinquent act.
* * *
Art. 843. Time for filing of petition; child in custody
A. If a child is continued in custody prior to adjudication, the delinquency
petition shall be filed within forty-eight hours of five days after the hearing to
determine continued custody.
B. If a child is not continued in custody prior to adjudication, the
delinquency petition alleging a misdemeanor-grade delinquent act shall be filed
within fifteen days after the hearing to determine continued custody.
C. If a child is not continued in custody prior to adjudication, the
delinquency petition alleging a felony-grade delinquent act shall be filed within
thirty days after the hearing to determine continued custody.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 140 ENROLLED
B. D. If no petition is filed within the applicable time period, the child shall
be released.
* * *
Art. 877. Adjudication hearing; time limitations
A. When the child is charged with a crime of violence as defined in R.S.
14:2(B) and the child is continued in custody pursuant to Chapter 5 of this Title, the
adjudication hearing shall commence within sixty ninety days of the appearance to
answer the petition. In all other cases, if the child is continued in custody pursuant
to Chapter 5 of this Title, the adjudication hearing shall commence within thirty
forty-five days of the appearance to answer the petition.
B. If the child is not continued in custody, the adjudication hearing shall
commence within ninety one hundred twenty days of the appearance to answer the
petition.
C. If the hearing has not been commenced timely, upon motion of the child,
the court shall release a child continued in custody and shall dismiss the petition.
D. For good cause, the court may extend such period. Upon the expiration
of the time limitations established by this Article and upon written motion to dismiss
that is filed by the child with certification of notice provided to the district attorney,
the court shall commence a contradictory hearing with the district attorney where the
court shall dismiss the petition if good cause for the delay is not shown. This right
of dismissal is waived unless the motion to dismiss is made prior to adjudication.
D. If the petition is dismissed pursuant to this Article, there shall be no
further proceedings against the child for the same or a lesser offense based on the
same facts.
Art. 877.1. Suspension of time limitations
A. The time limitations established in Article 877 shall be suspended if any
of the following occur:
(1) The child, at any time and with the purpose to avoid detection,
apprehension, or adjudication, flees from the state, is outside of the state, or is absent
from his usual place of abode or residence within the state.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 140 ENROLLED
(2) The child cannot be adjudicated because of a finding that the child lacks
the mental capacity to proceed and restoration services are ordered pursuant to
Article 837(B)(3) or (4), or the matter is continued in accordance with Article
837(D)(3).
(3) The juvenile fails to appear at any proceeding pursuant to actual notice,
with proof of such notice appearing in the record.
(4) The child cannot be adjudicated because of the inability to obtain his
presence through legal process, or for any other cause beyond the control of the state.
B. The running of the time limitations established in Article 877 shall resume
as follows:
(1) If suspended under Subparagraphs (A)(1) or (A)(3) of this Article, when
the child is either taken into custody or appears in person in open court where the
petition on the original charge is pending, or the district attorney adjudicating the
original charge has notice of the child's custodial location. For purposes of this
Paragraph, "notice" means either of the following:
(a) Filing in the court record where the petition on the original charge is
pending by either the child or the child's counsel advising the court of the child's
custodial location with a copy provided to the district attorney and certification of
notice provided to the district attorney.
(b) Filing in the court record where the petition on the original charge is
pending by an officer, as provided in Article 813, advising the court of the child's
custodial location with a copy provided to the district attorney and certification of
notice provided to the district attorney.
(2) If suspended under Subparagraph (A)(2) of this Article, when the court
finds the child has the mental capacity to proceed with delinquency proceedings.
(3) If suspended under Subparagraph (A)(4) of this Article, when the cause
beyond the state's control that was preventing the child from being adjudicated no
longer exists.
C. After the time limitations established in Article 877 resume pursuant to
Paragraph B of this Article, the adjudication proceedings shall commence within
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 140 ENROLLED
either the time period that remained before the Article 877 time limitation was
suspended or within thirty days, whichever time period is longer.
Section 2. Children's Code Article 815.1(E) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is authorized and directed to arrange
in alphabetical order and renumber the definitions contained in Children's Code Article 804
and to correct any cross-references to the renumbered paragraphs if necessary, consistent
with the provisions of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.